Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1610
Assurance of discontinuance of prohibited act; approval of court; not considered admission.

In the enforcement of the Consumer Protection Act, the Attorney General may accept an assurance of discontinuance of any act or practice deemed in violation of the Consumer Protection Act, from any person who engages in, or who has engaged in, such act or practice. Any such assurance shall be in writing and be filed with and subject to the approval of the district court of the county in which the alleged violator resides or has his or her principal place of business, or in Lancaster County.

Such assurance of discontinuance shall not be considered an admission of a violation for any purpose, but proof of failure to comply with the assurance of discontinuance shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of the Consumer Protection Act.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 17;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 28.